New Jersey, session 222, A1669.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  An owner of residential rental property required to obtain a certificate of inspection or occupancy by ordinance adopted pursuant to P.L.1979, c.476 (C.40:48-2.12m) shall attach a copy of the certificate to the lease for the applicable dwelling unit and deliver a copy of the certificate and lease to the tenant at the time of execution of the lease.  The owner shall have the tenant separately acknowledge receipt of the certificate by initialing the certificate. b.    If an owner fails to comply with the requirements of subsection a. of this section, the owner may cure the deficiency within 30 days after the date of execution of the lease by delivering a copy of the certificate to the tenant and securing the tenants acknowledgement of receipt of the certificate. c.     Failure of an owner to comply with the requirements of subsection a. or b. of this section shall render the lease voidable at the option of the tenant.  A tenant may exercise the option to void a lease pursuant to this subsection by providing written notice to the owner, and may then vacate the dwelling unit with no further financial obligation to the owner. d.    Within 30 days after a tenant vacates a dwelling unit pursuant to subsection c. of this section, the owner shall return to the tenant amounts deposited as security under the lease plus interest. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.